static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N2 0 осын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсын [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 осынлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсынлэсь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # твор.п.
SFX N2 0 ъёсынымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсынызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осыным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осынымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осынызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсыным [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсынымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыныз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсынызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсам [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # местн.п. + входн.п
SFX N2 0 ъёсамы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсад [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсады [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсаз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсазы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осам [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осамы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осад [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осады [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осаз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осазы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсам [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсамы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсад [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсады [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсаз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсазы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # входн.п.
SFX N2 0 осы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # исходн.п.
SFX N2 0 осысь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтым [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтыз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысьтызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осысьтым [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтыз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысьтызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтым [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтыз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысьтызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысен [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # отдал.п.
SFX N2 0 осысен [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысен [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеным [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысенымы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысеныз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсысенызы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осысеным [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысенымы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысеныз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осысенызы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеным [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысенымы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысеныз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсысенызы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсэтӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # перех.п.
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осэтӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсэтӥ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥ [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстӥзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 остӥм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остӥзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥм [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥмы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстӥзы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёслань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # направ.п.
SFX N2 0 ослань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёслань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызлань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссылань [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызлань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссылань [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдлань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызлань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссылань [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # предельн.п.
SFX N2 0 осозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсыдозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсызозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсмыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёстыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёссыозь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозям [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозямы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозяд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозяды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозяз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 ъёсозязы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N2 0 осыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осыдозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осызозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осмыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 остыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 оссыозь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозям [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозямы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозяд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозяды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозяз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 осозязы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N2 0 ёсыозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсыдозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсызозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсмыозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёстыозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёссыозь [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозям [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозямы [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозяд [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозяды [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозяз [ьъй]
SFX N2 0 ёсозязы [ьъй]
