static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
азьвыл/A1N2
бер/B1D1N2
мукет/M1N2A1N1
сюлэм/N1N2 # +сюлмы
йӧн/N1N2
лымыныл/N1N2
гурезёвыл/N2N1U2
валвыл/N2N1U2
музъемвыл/N2N1U2
саурвыл/N2N1U2
вуулосвыл/N2N1U2
писпувыл/N2N1U2
интывыл/N2N1U2
гурезьвыл/N2N1U2
огпал/N1N2
ожгаруж/N1N2# С.М.
азь/N2N1
азьдор/N2N1
ал/N2N1
алвыл/N2N1
амал/N2N1
ан/N2N1
ангес/N2N1
ар/N2# ?
арлыд/N2N1
асдун/N2N1
атайним/N2N1
бам/N2N1# ?
бер/N2N1
бер-азь/N2N1
бервыл/N2N1
бубыним/N2N1
бур/N2N1
бурд/N2N1
быж/N2N1
вандэттус/N2N1U2
вапум/N2N1# ?
ви/N2N1# ?
вир/N2N1
вирсэр/N2N1
виым/N2
вӧй/N2N1
вужер/N2N1
выл/N2# ?
вылтус/N2N1
вылтыр/N2N1
вын/N2N1
вынныл/N2N1
выр/N2N1
выр-бамал/N2N1
вырйыл/N2N1
вырос/N2N1# +выроскы
выртпул/N2N1
гадь/N2N1
гадьвыл/N2N1
гуразь/N2N1
гурбам/N2N1
гурул/N2N1
гырпинь/N2N1
гырпум/N2N1
дакыл/N2# ?
дӥнь/N2N1
дун/N2N1
дур/N2# ?
дыр/N2N1
ӝуш/N2N1# ?
зын/N2N1
инбам/N2N1
иськавын/N2N1
йӧл/N2N1
йӧл-вӧй/N2N1
йӧлвыл/N2N1
йыл/N2N1# ?
йыр/N2N1
йыразь/N2N1
йырбер/N2N1
йырвим/N2
йырвиым/N2
йыр-пыд/N2N1
каб/N2N1# ?
кал/N2N1
карйыл/N2N1
ки/N2N1
кибам/N2N1# ?
ки-пыд/N1N2
кӧбер/N2N1
кӧй/N2N1
кӧй-вӧй/N2N1
кӧл/N2N1
кӧм/N2N1# ?
кӧт/N2N1
кӧт-лул/N2N1
кӧтпуш/N2N1
кузпал/N2N1
кук/N2N1
кыд/N2N1# ?
кыдбер/N2N1# ?
кыл/N2N1
кымыс/N2N1# ?
кынар/N2N1# ?
лул/N2N1
лыд/N2N1# ?
лым/N2N1
мугор/N2N1
мыл/N2N1# ?
мылазь/N2N1
мылкыд/N2N1
нет/N2N1
ним/N2N1
нимтул/N2N1
нунал/N2N1
нод/N2N1
ныд/N2N1
ныл/N2N1
ныр/N2N1
ньӧл/N2N1
ньӧм/N2N1
ньӧр/N2N1
ӧр/N2N1
пал/N2N1
паллян/N2N1
пель/N2N1
пельсьӧр/N2N1
пинал/N2N1A1# ?
пинь/N2N1
пуд/N2N1# ?
пум/N2N1
пум-йыл/N2N1# ?
пумкыл/N2N1
пыд/N2N1
пыдкӧт/N2N1
пыдкук/N2N1
рад/N2N1
саль/N2N1
саес/N2N1# ?
сильвыл/N2N1
сильсьӧр/N2N1
сӥль/N2N1
сӥльвир/N2N1
синкаш/N2N1# ?
сӥныр/N2N1# ?
сирес/N2N1# ?
сӧзул/N2N1# ?
сузэр/N2N1# ?
суй/N2N1
суй-пыд/N2N1
сьöм/N2N1
сьӧр/N2N1# ?
сэп/N2N1# ?
сэрег/N2N1# ? + сэргын
сэрегпум/N2N1# ?
сюл/N2N1
сюл-ӝуш/N2N1# ?
сюр/N2N1
сям/N2N1# ?
тӧл/N2N1# ?
тус/N2N1
тусбуй/N2N1
туш/N2N1# ?
тыбыр/N2# ?
тыл/N2N1
ул/N2N1
улазь/N2N1# ?
урдэс/N2# ?
ӵын/N2N1# ?
шӧй/N2N1# ?
шӧм/N2# ?
шор/N2N1
шурйыл/N2N1# ?
ым/N2N1
ыман/N2N1
ымдур/N2N1# ?
ымныр/N2N1
ярдур/N2N1
пыдес/N8N2N1
пыдэс/N8N2N1# +пыдсы
кӧтпыдэс/N8N2N1
мед/P1N2
